Mississippi, session 2026, HB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established the "Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship Program," the purpose of which is to attract former collegiate athletes who did not complete a baccalaureate degree to become licensed teachers by awarding full scholarships to those persons declaring an intention to serve in the teaching field who actually render service to the state while possessing an appropriate teaching license. (2)  An individual who has completed at least two (2) semesters of study as a student-athlete in an institution of higher learning who subsequently is enrolled in or accepted for enrollment at a teacher education program approved by the State Board of Education or other program at a baccalaureate degree-granting institution of higher learning which will qualify the person to pursue an alternate route teaching license in the State of Mississippi is eligible for a financial scholarship to be applied toward the costs of the individual's college education.  To be eligible, a student must express in writing an intention to teach in a public school in the state upon graduation.  The annual amount of the award must be equal to the total cost for tuition, room and meals, books, materials and fees at the college or university in which the student is enrolled, not to exceed an amount equal to the highest total cost of tuition, room and meals, books, materials and fees assessed by a state institution of higher learning during that school year. (3)  Awards granted under the Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship Program are available to both full-time and part-time students.  Students enrolling on a full-time basis may receive a maximum of three (3) annual awards.  The maximum number of awards that may be made to students attending school on a part-time basis, and the maximum time period for part-time students to complete the number of academic hours necessary to obtain a baccalaureate degree in education, shall be established by rules and regulations jointly promulgated by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the State Board of Education.  Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarships may not be based upon an applicant's eligibility for financial aid. (4)  Except in those cases where employment positions may not be available upon completion of licensure requirements, at the beginning of the first school year in which a recipient of a Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship is eligible for employment as a licensed teacher or a nontraditional teacher intern pursuant to Section 37-3-2(6)(b), that person shall begin to render service as a licensed teacher or nontraditional teacher intern in a public school district, as approved by the State Board of Education.  Persons who received annual awards must render service as follows: (a)  A person who received three (3) or fewer annual awards, but more than two (2) annual awards, must render five (5) year's service as a licensed teacher in a public school in Mississippi. (b)  A person who received two (2) or fewer annual awards, but more than one (1) annual award, must render three (3) year's service as a licensed teacher in a public school in Mississippi. (c)  A person who received one (1) or fewer annual awards must render one (1) year's service as a licensed teacher in a public school in Mississippi. (5)  A person failing to complete a program of study that will enable the person to become a licensed teacher or nontraditional teacher intern under Section 37-3-2(6)(b), as the case may be, is liable immediately to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the sum of all Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship awards made to that person, plus interest accruing at the current Stafford Loan rate at the time the person abrogates participation in the program.  A person failing to complete his or her teaching obligation, as required under subsection (4) of this section, is liable immediately to the board for the sum of all scholarship awards made to that person less the corresponding amount of any awards for which service has been rendered, plus interest accruing at the current Stafford Loan rate at the time the person discontinues service, except in the case of a deferral of debt for cause by the State Board of Education when there is no employment position immediately available upon a teacher's completion of licensure requirements.  After the period of deferral, the person must begin or resume teaching duties as required under subsection (4) or become liable to the board under this subsection.  If a claim for payment under this subsection is placed in the hands of an attorney for collection, the obligor is liable for an additional amount equal to a reasonable attorney's fee. (6)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the State Board of Education, acting jointly, shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration of the Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship Program.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is the administering agency of the program. (7)  If insufficient funds are available to fully fund scholarship awards to all eligible students, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall make the awards to first-time students on a first-come, first-served basis; however, priority consideration must be given to persons previously receiving awards under the Former Collegiate Athlete Scholarship Program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.